Nebraska, session 109, LB358.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB358 LB358
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 83-178, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-178 (1) The director shall establish and maintain, in accordance
with the regulations of the department, an individual file for each
person committed offender to the department. Each individual file shall
include, when available and appropriate, the following information on
such person:
(a) His or her admission summary;
(b) His or her presentence investigation report;
(c) His or her classification report and recommendation;
(d) Official records of his or her conviction and commitment as well
as any earlier criminal records;
(e) Progress reports and admission-orientation reports;
(f) Reports of any disciplinary infractions and of their
disposition;
(g) His or her parole plan; and
(h) Other pertinent data concerning his or her background, conduct,
associations, and family relationships.
(2)(a) (2) Any decision concerning the classification,
reclassification, transfer to another facility, preparole preparation, or
parole release of a person committed offender to the department shall be
made only after his or her file has been reviewed.
(b) The content of the file shall be confidential and shall not be
subject to public inspection except by court order for good cause shown.
The content of the file and shall not be accessible to any person
committed offender, except that a committed offender shall be given
access to his or her own individual file upon written request to the
chief executive officer of the facility to the department.
(c) A committed offender An inmate may obtain access to his or her
medical records by request to the provider pursuant to sections 71-8401
to 71-8407 notwithstanding the fact that such medical records may be a
-2-

LB358 LB358
2025 2025
part of his or her individual department file. The department retains the
authority to withhold mental health and psychological records of the
committed offender inmate when appropriate.
(3) The program of each person committed offender to the department
shall be reviewed at regular intervals and recommendations shall be made
to the chief executive officer of the facility concerning changes in such
person's program of treatment, training, employment, care, and custody as
are considered necessary or desirable.
(4) The chief executive officer of the facility shall have final
authority to determine matters of treatment classification within his or
her facility and to recommend to the director the transfer of any person
committed offender to the department who is in his or her custody.
(5) The director may at any time order a person committed offender
to the department to undergo further examination and study for additional
recommendations concerning his or her classification, custodial control,
and rehabilitative treatment.
(6) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit in any
manner the authority of the Public Counsel to inspect and examine the
records and documents of the department pursuant to sections 81-8,240 to
81-8,254, except that the Public Counsel's access to a committed
offender's an inmate's medical or mental health records shall be subject
to the committed offender's the inmate's consent. The office of Public
Counsel shall not disclose a commited offender's an inmate's medical or
mental health records to anyone else, including any other person
committed offender to the department, except as authorized by law.
Sec. 2. Original section 83-178, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-